South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4740.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 101, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-101-440.  (A) For purposes of this section: (1) "School mapping data" means information collected pursuant to this section in an electronic or a digital format and provided to assist first responders in responding to emergencies in an institution of higher learning. (2) "Institution of higher learning" means: (a) state-supported colleges and universities enumerated in Section 59-101-10; (b) state-supported technical institutions under the jurisdiction of the State Board for Technical and Comprehensive Education; and (c) private historically black colleges and universities in this State, which are Allen University, Claflin University, Clinton College, Morris College, and Voorhees College. (B)(1) To facilitate efficient emergency responses in institutions of higher learning by public safety agencies in this State, the School Mapping Data Program is established as a statewide initiative within the Commission on Higher Education. Subject to funding, the commission shall contract with a vendor to provide school mapping data for each institution of higher learning in the State. The data must be provided to the institution, local law enforcement agencies, and public safety agencies for use in response to emergencies. For purposes of this section, emergencies include, but are not limited to, any event in which a law enforcement officer, firefighter, rescue squad, emergency medical service provider, public safety telecommunicator, or any other emergency management provider may respond. (2) In addition to requirements set forth by the commission and in consultation with the Center for School Safety and Targeted Violence within the State Law Enforcement Division, school mapping data must: (a) be compatible with software platforms used by local, county, state, and federal public safety agencies that provide emergency services to the specific institution of higher learning for which the data is provided without requiring such agencies to purchase additional software or requiring a fee to view or access the data; (b) be compatible with security software platforms in use by the specific institution for which the data is provided without requiring the local law enforcement agencies or institutions to purchase additional software or requiring a fee to view or access the data; and (c) provide that any updates to school mapping data as defined by this section must be accessible within software platforms used by local, county, state, and federal public safety agencies that provide emergency services to the specific institution. (C) The commission shall pay annual maintenance fees to update school maps to ensure the floor plans and aerial imagery are accurate and up-to-date. (D) School mapping data provided to institutions, local law enforcement agencies, and public safety agencies for use in response to emergencies pursuant to this section must be regarded as confidential information. A private institution of higher learning or a private security provider used by a public institution of higher learning to provide campus security may not disclose such information except pursuant to a court order. A public body in possession of such information: (1) may not disclose such information pursuant to a request under the South Carolina Freedom of Information Act; and (2) only may disclose such information pursuant to the procedures established in Section 23-50-45. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----